Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9-234.5] Reporting of
actions. (a) A licensee shall report in writing to the commissioner any
civil or administrative action taken against the licensee in any jurisdiction
or by any governmental agency in the United States within thirty days of the
final disposition of the matter.

(b) Within thirty days of arraignment, a
licensee shall report in writing to the commissioner any criminal prosecution
of the licensee being taken in any jurisdiction.

(c) A report pursuant to this section shall
include a copy of the initial complaint or indictment and any and all other
relevant legal documents. [L 2010, c 116, §1(2)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next